Georgia, session 2025_26, SB328.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
An Act creating a State Court of Henry County, approved March 27, 1998 (Ga. L. 1998, p.
3954), as amended, particularly by an Act approved May 13, 2008 (Ga. L. 2008, p. 4090),
is amended by revising Section 11 as follows:
S. B. 328
- 1 -

LC 62 0105
"SECTION 11.
(a) Until January 1, 2026, there shall be four judges of the State Court of Henry County.
The judges of the state court in office on January 1, 2025, shall continue to serve the term
of office to which such judge was elected and until the election and qualification of his or
her successor.
(b) Effective January 1, 2026, there shall be five judges of the State Court of Henry
County. The fifth judge added effective January 1, 2026, shall be appointed by the
Governor for an initial term of office ending December 31, 2028, and until the election and
qualification of his or her successor. The successor to said judge shall be elected by the
qualified voters of Henry County at a nonpartisan election to be held and conducted jointly
with the general election in 2028 and quadrennially thereafter pursuant to Code
Section 21-2-138 of the O.C.G.A. The judge thus elected shall serve a four-year term until
the election and qualification of his or her successor.
(c) The judges of said court shall have such qualifications and shall be subject to such
restrictions and discipline as provided in Chapter 7 of Title 15 of the O.C.G.A. Said judges
shall be vested with the power and authority of the judges of the state courts by Chapter 7
of Title 15 of the O.C.G.A.
(d) The judges shall devote their full time to the duties of said office and shall be paid a
salary equal to 90 percent of the salary now or hereafter paid to the judges of the Superior
Court of Henry County. Said salary shall be payable out of the funds of Henry County at
the same intervals as installments are paid to other county employees.
(e) The judge of the State Court of Henry County who has served the longest period of
time in office as judge of said court shall be the chief judge of the State Court of Henry
County, and such chief judge shall receive a salary supplement of $10,000.00 per annum
to compensate him or her for the administrative duties imposed upon the chief judge.
S. B. 328
- 2 -

LC 62 0105
(f) In the event it should become necessary, the chief judge may appoint a judge pro hac
vice to serve, not to exceed a one-year term per appointment. Such judge pro hac vice shall
meet the same requirements as a judge of the State Court of Henry County."
SECTION 2.
This Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law
without such approval.
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 328
- 3 -